Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1902
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act, the
definitions found in sections 85-1903 to 85-1910 apply.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 5.